Illinois, session 104th, HB2740.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Section 2.33 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.33)7    Sec. 2.33. Prohibitions. 8    (a) It is unlawful to carry or possess any gun in any State 9refuge unless otherwise permitted by administrative rule.10    (b) It is unlawful to use or possess any snare or 11snare-like device, deadfall, net, or pit trap to take any 12species, except that snares not powered by springs or other 13mechanical devices may be used to trap fur-bearing mammals, in 14water sets only, if at least one-half of the snare noose is 15located underwater at all times.16    (c) It is unlawful for any person at any time to take a 17wild mammal protected by this Act from its den by means of any 18mechanical device, spade, or digging device or to use smoke or 19other gases to dislodge or remove such mammal except as 20provided in Section 2.37.21    (d) It is unlawful to use a ferret or any other small 22mammal which is used in the same or similar manner for which 23ferrets are used for the purpose of frightening or driving any   HB2740- 2 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1mammals from their dens or hiding places.2    (e) (Blank).3    (f) It is unlawful to use spears, gigs, hooks, or any like 4device to take any species protected by this Act.5    (g) It is unlawful to use poisons, chemicals, or 6explosives for the purpose of taking any species protected by 7this Act.8    (h) It is unlawful to hunt adjacent to or near any peat, 9grass, brush, or other inflammable substance when it is 10burning.11    (i) It is unlawful to take, pursue or intentionally harass 12or disturb in any manner any wild birds or mammals by use or 13aid of any vehicle, conveyance, or unmanned aircraft as 14defined by the Illinois Aeronautics Act, except for the 15tracking of wounded animals in the course of hunting or, as 16permitted by the Code of Federal Regulations, for the taking 17of waterfowl; except that nothing in this subsection shall 18prohibit the use of unmanned aircraft in the inspection of a 19public utility facility, tower, or structure or a mobile 20service facility, tower, or structure by a public utility, as 21defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, or a 22provider of mobile services as defined in Section 153 of Title 2347 of the United States Code. It is also unlawful to use the 24lights of any vehicle or conveyance, any light connected to 25any vehicle or conveyance, or any other lighting device or 26mechanism from inside or on a vehicle or conveyance in any area   HB2740- 3 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1where wildlife may be found except in accordance with Section 22.37 of this Act; however, nothing in this Section shall 3prohibit the normal use of headlamps for the purpose of 4driving upon a roadway. For purposes of this Section, any 5other lighting device or mechanism shall include, but not be 6limited to, any device that uses infrared or other light not 7visible to the naked eye, electronic image intensification, 8active illumination, thermal imaging, or night vision. Striped 9skunk, opossum, red fox, gray fox, raccoon, bobcat, and coyote 10may be taken during the open season by use of a small light 11which is worn on the body or hand-held by a person on foot and 12not in any vehicle.13    (j) It is unlawful to use any shotgun larger than 10 gauge 14while taking or attempting to take any of the species 15protected by this Act.16    (k) It is unlawful to use or possess in the field any 17shotgun shell loaded with a shot size larger than lead BB or 18steel T (.20 diameter) when taking or attempting to take any 19species of wild game mammals (excluding white-tailed deer), 20wild game birds, migratory waterfowl or migratory game birds 21protected by this Act, except white-tailed deer as provided 22for in Section 2.26 and other species as provided for by 23subsection (l) or administrative rule.24    (l) It is unlawful to take any species of wild game, except 25white-tailed deer and fur-bearing mammals, with a shotgun 26loaded with slugs unless otherwise provided for by   HB2740- 4 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1administrative rule.2    (m) It is unlawful to use any shotgun capable of holding 3more than 3 shells in the magazine or chamber combined, except 4on game breeding and hunting preserve areas licensed under 5Section 3.27 and except as permitted by the Code of Federal 6Regulations for the taking of waterfowl. If the shotgun is 7capable of holding more than 3 shells, it shall, while being 8used on an area other than a game breeding and shooting 9preserve area licensed pursuant to Section 3.27, be fitted 10with a one-piece plug that is irremovable without dismantling 11the shotgun or otherwise altered to render it incapable of 12holding more than 3 shells in the magazine and chamber, 13combined.14    (n) It is unlawful for any person, except persons who 15possess a permit to hunt from a vehicle as provided in this 16Section and persons otherwise permitted by law, to have or 17carry any gun in or on any vehicle, conveyance, or aircraft, 18unless such gun is unloaded and enclosed in a case, except that 19at field trials authorized by Section 2.34 of this Act, 20unloaded guns or guns loaded with blank cartridges only may be 21carried on horseback while not contained in a case, or to have 22or carry any bow or arrow device in or on any vehicle unless 23such bow or arrow device is unstrung or enclosed in a case, or 24otherwise made inoperable unless in accordance with the 25Firearm Concealed Carry Act.26    (o) (Blank).  HB2740- 5 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1    (p) It is unlawful to take game birds, migratory game 2birds or migratory waterfowl with a rifle, pistol, revolver, 3or air rifle.4    (q) It is unlawful to fire a rifle, pistol, revolver, or 5air rifle on, over, or into any waters of this State, including 6frozen waters.7    (r) It is unlawful to discharge any gun or bow and arrow 8device along, upon, across, or from any public right-of-way or 9highway in this State.10    (s) It is unlawful to use a silencer or other device to 11muffle or mute the sound of the explosion or report resulting 12from the firing of any gun.13    (t) It is unlawful for any person to take or attempt to 14take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, or allow a dog 15to hunt, within or upon the land of another, or upon waters 16flowing over or standing on the land of another, or to 17knowingly shoot a gun or bow and arrow device at any wildlife 18physically on or flying over the property of another without 19first obtaining permission from the owner or the owner's 20designee. For the purposes of this Section, the owner's 21designee means anyone who the owner designates in a written 22authorization and the authorization must contain (i) the legal 23or common description of property for which such authority is 24given, (ii) the extent that the owner's designee is authorized 25to make decisions regarding who is allowed to take or attempt 26to take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, and (iii) the   HB2740- 6 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1owner's notarized signature. Before enforcing this Section, 2the law enforcement officer must have received notice from the 3owner or the owner's designee of a violation of this Section. 4Statements made to the law enforcement officer regarding this 5notice shall not be rendered inadmissible by the hearsay rule 6when offered for the purpose of showing the required notice.7    (u) It is unlawful for any person to discharge any firearm 8for the purpose of taking any of the species protected by this 9Act, or hunt with gun or dog, or allow a dog to hunt, within 10300 yards of an inhabited dwelling without first obtaining 11permission from the owner or tenant, except that while 12trapping, hunting with bow and arrow, hunting with dog and 13shotgun using shot shells only, or hunting with shotgun using 14shot shells only, or providing outfitting services under a 15waterfowl outfitter permit, or on licensed game breeding and 16hunting preserve areas, as defined in Section 3.27, on 17federally owned and managed lands and on Department owned, 18managed, leased, or controlled lands, a 100 yard restriction 19shall apply.20    (v) It is unlawful for any person to remove fur-bearing 21mammals from, or to move or disturb in any manner, the traps 22owned by another person without written authorization of the 23owner to do so.24    (w) It is unlawful for any owner of a dog to allow his or 25her dog to pursue, harass, or kill deer, except that nothing in 26this Section shall prohibit the tracking of wounded deer with   HB2740- 7 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1a dog in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.26 of this 2Code.3    (x) It is unlawful for any person to wantonly or 4carelessly injure or destroy, in any manner whatsoever, any 5real or personal property on the land of another while engaged 6in hunting or trapping thereon.7    (y) It is unlawful to hunt wild game protected by this Act 8between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before 9sunrise, except that hunting hours between one-half hour after 10sunset and one-half hour before sunrise may be established by 11administrative rule for fur-bearing mammals.12    (z) It is unlawful to take any game bird (excluding wild 13turkeys and crippled pheasants not capable of normal flight 14and otherwise irretrievable) protected by this Act when not 15flying. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a person from 16carrying an uncased, unloaded shotgun in a boat, while in 17pursuit of a crippled migratory waterfowl that is incapable of 18normal flight, for the purpose of attempting to reduce the 19migratory waterfowl to possession, provided that the attempt 20is made immediately upon downing the migratory waterfowl and 21is done within 400 yards of the blind from which the migratory 22waterfowl was downed. This exception shall apply only to 23migratory game birds that are not capable of normal flight. 24Migratory waterfowl that are crippled may be taken only with a 25shotgun as regulated by subsection (j) of this Section using 26shotgun shells as regulated in subsection (k) of this Section.  HB2740- 8 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1    (aa) It is unlawful to use or possess any device that may 2be used for tree climbing or cutting while hunting fur-bearing 3mammals, excluding coyotes. However, coyotes may not be hunted 4utilizing these devices during open season for deer except by 5properly licensed deer hunters.6    (bb) It is unlawful for any person, except licensed game 7breeders, pursuant to Section 2.29 to import, carry into, or 8possess alive in this State any species of wildlife taken 9outside of this State, without obtaining permission to do so 10from the Director.11    (cc) It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her 12possession any freshly killed species protected by this Act 13during the season closed for taking.14    (dd) It is unlawful to take any species protected by this 15Act and retain it alive except as provided by administrative 16rule.17    (ee) It is unlawful to possess any rifle while in the field 18during gun deer season except as provided in Sections 2.25 and 192.26 and administrative rules.20    (ff) It is unlawful for any person to take any species 21protected by this Act, except migratory waterfowl, during the 22gun deer hunting season in those counties open to gun deer 23hunting, unless he or she wears, when in the field, a cap and 24upper outer garment of a solid blaze orange color or solid 25blaze pink color, with such articles of clothing displaying a 26minimum of 400 square inches of blaze orange or solid blaze   HB2740- 9 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1pink color material.2    (gg) It is unlawful during the upland game season for any 3person to take upland game with a firearm unless he or she 4wears, while in the field, a cap of solid blaze orange color or 5solid blaze pink color. For purposes of this Act, upland game 6is defined as Bobwhite Quail, Hungarian Partridge, Ring-necked 7Pheasant, Eastern Cottontail, and Swamp Rabbit.8    (hh) It shall be unlawful to kill or cripple any species 9protected by this Act for which there is a bag limit without 10making a reasonable effort to retrieve such species and 11include such in the bag limit. It shall be unlawful for any 12person having control over harvested game mammals, game birds, 13or migratory game birds for which there is a bag limit to 14wantonly waste or destroy the usable meat of the game, except 15this shall not apply to wildlife taken under Sections 2.37 or 163.22 of this Code. For purposes of this subsection, "usable 17meat" means the breast meat of a game bird or migratory game 18bird and the hind ham and front shoulders of a game mammal. It 19shall be unlawful for any person to place, leave, dump, or 20abandon a wildlife carcass or parts of it along or upon a 21public right-of-way or highway or on public or private 22property, including a waterway or stream, without the 23permission of the owner or tenant. It shall not be unlawful to 24discard game meat that is determined to be unfit for human 25consumption.26    (ii) This Section shall apply only to those species   HB2740- 10 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1protected by this Act taken within the State. Any species or 2any parts thereof, legally taken in and transported from other 3states or countries, may be possessed within the State, except 4as provided in this Section and Sections 2.35, 2.36, and 3.21.5    (jj) (Blank).6    (kk) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 7Director from issuing permits to paraplegics or to other 8persons with disabilities who meet the requirements set forth 9in administrative rule to shoot or hunt from a vehicle as 10provided by that rule, provided that such is otherwise in 11accord with this Act.12    (ll) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the 13taking of aquatic life protected by the Fish and Aquatic Life 14Code or birds and mammals protected by this Act, except deer 15and fur-bearing mammals, from a boat not camouflaged or 16disguised to alter its identity or to further provide a place 17of concealment and not propelled by sail or mechanical power. 18However, only shotguns not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller 19than .410 bore loaded with not more than 3 shells of a shot 20size no larger than lead BB or steel T (.20 diameter) may be 21used to take species protected by this Act.22    (mm) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the use 23of a shotgun, not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller than a 20 24gauge, with a rifled barrel.25    (nn) It shall be unlawful to possess any species of 26wildlife or wildlife parts taken unlawfully in Illinois, any   HB2740- 11 -LRB104 09540 BDA 19603 b1other state, or any other country, whether or not the wildlife 2or wildlife parts are indigenous to Illinois. For the purposes 3of this subsection, the statute of limitations for unlawful 4possession of wildlife or wildlife parts shall not cease until 52 years after the possession has permanently ended. 6    (oo) It is unlawful while deer hunting:7        (1) to possess or be in close proximity to a rifle that 8    is not centerfire; or9        (2) to be in possession of or in close proximity to a 10    magazine that is capable of making a rifle not a single 11    shot. 12(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 13102-932, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.)